Washington statutes.
RCW 29B.25.150

Earmarked contributions. (Effective January 1, 2026.)

[(1)] A political committee receiving a contribution earmarked for the benefit of a candidate or another political committee shall:

(1) [(a)] Report the contribution as required in RCW 29B.25.090 and 29B.25.100;

(2) [(b)] Complete a report, entitled "Earmarked contributions," on a form prescribed by the commission that identifies the name and address of the person who made the contribution, the candidate or political committee for whose benefit the contribution is earmarked, the amount of the contribution, and the date that the contribution was received; and

(3) [(c)] Mail or deliver to the commission and the candidate or political committee benefiting from the contribution a copy of the "Earmarked contributions" report within two working days of receipt of the contribution.

(4) [(2)] A candidate or political committee receiving notification of an earmarked contribution under subsection (3) [(1)(c)] of this section shall report the contribution, once notification of the contribution is received by the candidate or committee, in the same manner as any other contribution, as required by RCW 29B.25.090 and 29B.25.100.

[ 2024 c 164 s 432; 2010 c 204 s 416; 1989 c 280 s 13; 1986 c 228 s 3. Formerly RCW 42.17A.270, 42.17.135.]

NOTES:

Intent—Construction—Rules remain valid—Effective date—2024 c 164: See notes following RCW 29B.10.010.

Effective date—2010 c 204 ss 101-504, 506-601, 603-702, and 801-1103: See note following RCW 29B.15.010.

Effective date—1989 c 280: See note following RCW 29B.25.020.